Hawaii statutes.
§183D-7 Expenditures. (a) The
department may expend all appropriations made for the purpose of effectuating
the objectives of title 12. The department may expend proceeds in the wildlife
revolving fund, without appropriation or allotment as authorized under section
37-40, for the purposes specified under section 183D-10.5. All expenditures by
the department shall be approved and certified by the board.

(b) To further the purposes of title 12, the
department may use lands set apart for its use by the governor, and may accept
gifts and contributions of property or service or enter into contracts for the
furtherance of the purposes of this chapter, from the State or from any county
or other government or from private parties. [L 1985, c 174, pt of §4; am L
1988, c 67, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next